California statutes. Penal Code
(a) Subject to the requirements and conditions set forth in this section and Section 11105, local law enforcement agencies are hereby authorized to provide state criminal summary history information obtained through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System (CLETS) for the purpose of screening prospective participants and prospective and current staff of a regional, county, city, or other local public housing authority, at the request of the chief executive officer of the authority or his or her designee, upon a showing by that authority that the authority manages a Section 8 housing program pursuant to federal law
 (United States Housing Act of 1937), operates housing at which children under the age of 18 years reside, or operates housing for persons categorized as aged, blind, or disabled.

(b) The following requirements shall apply to information released by local law enforcement agencies pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) Local law enforcement agencies shall not release any information unless it relates to a conviction for a serious felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, a conviction for any offense punishable under Section 273.5, 422.6, 422.7, 422.75, 422.9, or 422.76, or under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 29800) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 29900) of Division 9 of Title 4 of Part 6, or under any provision listed in Section 16590, a conviction under Section 273.6 that involves a violation of a protective order, as
 defined in Section 6218 of the Family Code, or a conviction for any felony offense that involves controlled substances or alcoholic beverages, or any felony offense that involves any activity related to controlled substances or alcoholic beverages, or a conviction for any offense that involves domestic violence, as defined in Section 13700.

(2) Local law enforcement agencies shall not release information concerning an arrest for an offense that did not result in a conviction.

(3) Local law enforcement agencies shall not release information concerning an offense committed by a person who was under 18 years of age at the time he or she committed the offense.

(4) Local law enforcement agencies shall release any information concerning any conviction or release from custody that occurred within 10 years of the date on
 which the request for information is submitted to the Attorney General, unless the conviction was based upon a felony offense that involved controlled substances or alcoholic beverages or a felony offense that involved any activity related to controlled substances or alcoholic beverages. Where a conviction was based on any of these felony offenses, local law enforcement agencies shall release information concerning this conviction if the conviction occurred within five years of the date on which a request for the information was submitted.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraph (4), if information that meets the requirements of paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, is located and the information reveals a conviction of an offense specified in paragraph (1), local law enforcement agencies shall release all summary criminal history information concerning the person whether or not the information meets the requirements of paragraph (4), provided, however, that
 the information meets the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive.

(6) Information released to the local public housing authority pursuant to this section shall also be released to parole or probation officers at the same time.

(c) State summary criminal history information shall be used by the chief executive officer of the housing authority or a designee only for purposes of identifying prospective participants in subsidized programs and prospective and current staff who have access to residences, whose criminal history is likely to pose a risk to children under 18 years of age or persons categorized as aged, blind, or disabled living in the housing operated by the authority.

(d) If a housing authority obtains summary criminal history information for the purpose of screening a prospective participant
 pursuant to this section, it shall review and evaluate that information in the context of other available information and shall not evaluate the person’s suitability as a prospective participant based solely on his or her past criminal history.

(e) If a housing authority determines that a prospective participant is not eligible as a resident, it shall promptly notify him or her of the basis for its determination and, upon request, shall provide him or her within a reasonable time after the determination is made with an opportunity for an informal hearing on the determination in accordance with Section 960.207 of Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) Any information obtained from state summary criminal history information pursuant to this section is confidential and the recipient public housing authority shall not disclose or use the information for any purpose other
 than that authorized by this section. The state summary criminal history information in the possession of the authority and all copies made from it shall be destroyed not more than 30 days after the authority’s final decision whether to act on the housing status of the individual to whom the information relates.

(g) The local public housing authority receiving state summary criminal history information pursuant to this section shall adopt regulations governing the receipt, maintenance, and use of the information. The regulations shall include provisions that require notice that the authority has access to criminal records of participants and employees who have access to programs.

(h) Use of this information is to be consistent with Title 24 of the Code of Federal Regulations and the current regulations adopted by the housing authority using the information.

(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a housing authority to request and review an applicant’s criminal history.

(j) The California Housing Authorities Association, after compiling data from all public housing authorities that receive summary criminal information pursuant to this chapter, shall report its findings based upon this data to the Legislature prior to January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 135.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.04.

(a) A designated Court Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) program shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information of employment and volunteer candidates for the purpose of conducting a state and federal criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105, and obtaining information as to the existence and nature of a record of a child abuse investigation contained in the Child Abuse Central Index.

(b) When requesting state-level criminal offender record information pursuant to this section, the designated CASA program shall request a subsequent arrest notification, pursuant to Section 11105.2, for all employment and volunteer candidates.

(c) (1) The department shall monitor the Child Abuse Central Index and notify the CASA program if a record of a child abuse investigation
 involving a CASA employee or volunteer is subsequently added to the Child Abuse Central Index.

(2) (A) If a CASA program knows that an individual for whom notification is requested is no longer in a position for which notification is authorized, the CASA program shall immediately notify the department to terminate notification for that individual.

(B) The department shall terminate notification for the individual upon receipt of the notification required in subparagraph (A).

(3) Not less than every six months, a CASA program shall verify that each individual for whom notification has not been terminated is still in a position with the program for which notification is authorized.

(4) If a CASA program receives a subsequent notification for an individual unknown to the CASA program or for whom the CASA program terminated notification, it shall immediately inform the department that the individual is unknown to the CASA program or that it terminated the notification request for the individual.

(d) The department shall provide a state- and federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section
 11105.

(e) (1) The department shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the requests for federal-level criminal offender record information.

(2) The department shall not charge a fee for state-level criminal offender record information.

(3) The department may increase its fee for a CASA employment and volunteer candidate sufficient to cover the cost of processing subsequent notifications of a child abuse investigation
 from the Child Abuse Central Index.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) A designated CASA program is a local court-appointed special advocate program as described in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) There shall be only one designated CASA program in each California county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   (AB 741)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.05.

(a) Criminal justice agencies, as defined in Section 13101, shall require employees, prospective employees, volunteers, contractors, and subcontractors, as specified in subdivision (c), to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(b) Criminal justice agencies shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information for individuals specified in subdivision (a) who are subject to a state and national criminal history background check, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 11105.

(c) Subdivision (a) only applies to a volunteer, contractor, or subcontractor who does either of the following:

(1) Provides services for the administration of criminal justice as that term is defined in Section 20.3 of Subpart A of Part 20 of Chapter I of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Has direct or remote access to the criminal justice agency’s systems or unescorted access to the criminal justice agency’s facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 23.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.06.

The Department of Justice shall retain an individual’s fingerprint images and related information submitted as part of a peace officer or nonsworn law enforcement agency employee preemployment criminal offender record information search request. When responding to preemployment criminal offender record information search requests pursuant to subdivision (k) or (l) of Section 11105, the department shall disseminate the request date and requesting agency name associated with all retained peace officer and nonsworn law enforcement agency employee information search requests.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 97, Sec. 2.   (AB 297)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.07.

(a) An animal control officer, when necessary for performing his or her official duties, shall provide a compelling reason to an appropriate criminal justice agency to obtain state summary criminal history information.

(b) Upon a showing of compelling need, the criminal justice agency shall respond to the animal control officer with state summary criminal history information obtained through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications Systems (CLETS). The criminal justice agency shall provide this information to the animal control officer in a timely manner. A criminal justice agency may charge a reasonable fee sufficient to cover the costs of providing information pursuant to this
 subdivision.

(c) An animal control officer who receives state summary criminal history information pursuant to this section shall not use that information for any purpose other than for the performance of his or her official duties.

(d) A law enforcement officer or other person authorized by law to provide or receive information obtained through CLETS pursuant to this section who knowingly furnishes the record or information to a person who is not authorized by law to receive that information is guilty of violating Section 11142.

(e) For the purposes of this section, an animal control officer is a person authorized to exercise the powers specified in Section 830.9.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.   (AB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.08.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a tribe or tribal organization may request from the Department of Justice state and federal summary criminal history information for the purpose of licensing or approving a tribally approved home, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, for the placement of an Indian child into foster or adoptive care.

(b) A tribe or tribal organization shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of an individual applying with the tribe or tribal organization as a prospective foster parent or adoptive parent, any adult who resides or is employed
 in the home of an applicant, any person who has a familial or intimate relationship with any person living in the home of an applicant, or employee of the child welfare agency who may have contact with a child, for the purposes of obtaining the individual’s full criminal record pursuant to Section 8712 of the Family Code.

(c) Upon receipt of a tribe’s or tribal organization’s request for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section, the Department of Justice shall transmit the request to the Federal Bureau of Investigation. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate a response to the requesting tribe or tribal organization.

(d) The Department of Justice
 shall provide a state and federal level response to a tribe or tribal organization pursuant to Section 8712 of the Family Code.

(e) A tribe or tribal organization shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent notification service pursuant to Section 11105.2 for persons described in subdivision (b) of this section.

(f) The Department of Justice may charge a fee sufficient to cover the reasonable and appropriate costs of processing the request pursuant to this section.

(g) As used in this section a “tribal organization” means an entity designated by a federally recognized tribe as authorized to approve a home consistent with Section 1915 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1915) for the
 purpose of placing an Indian child into foster or adoptive care. This includes the authority to conduct a criminal or child abuse background check of, and grant exemptions to, an individual who is a prospective foster or adoptive parent, an adult who resides or is employed in the home of an applicant for approval, any person who has a familial or intimate relationship with any person living in the home of an applicant, or an employee of a tribal child welfare agency who may have contact with a child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   (AB 1283)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.1.

(a) The following persons shall be furnished with state summary criminal history information when needed in the course of their duties:

(1) The director of a state hospital or other treatment facility to which a person is committed for treatment under Sections 1026 and 1370 of the Penal Code, or Section 5250, if committed for being dangerous to others, or Section 5300, or former Section 6316 or 6321, of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The community program director or the director’s designee under any of the following conditions:

(A) When ordered to evaluate a defendant for the court under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1370 and subdivision (b) of Section 1026 of the Penal Code, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of former Section 6316 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) When ordered to provide outpatient treatment and supervision services under Title 15 (commencing with Section 1600) of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(C) When a patient is committed for being dangerous to others under Section 5250 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(D) When the director or the director’s designee provides evaluation, supervision, or treatment for a person under Section 2964 or 2972.

(3) The officer providing conservatorship investigation under Section 5354 of the Welfare and Institutions Code in cases where referral for conservatorship is made while the proposed conservatee is being treated under Section 1026 or 1370 of the Penal Code or Section 5250, if committed for being dangerous to others, or Section 5300, or former Section 6316 or 6321, of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) In all instances pursuant to subdivision (a), the criminal history record shall be transmitted by the court with the request for evaluation or during the conservatorship investigation or with the order committing the person to a treatment facility or approving outpatient status, except that the director of a state hospital, the county mental health director, and the officer providing conservatorship investigation may receive the state summary criminal history information from the law enforcement agency that referred the person for evaluation and treatment under Section 5150 of the Welfare and Institutions Code if the person has been subsequently committed for being dangerous to others under Section 5250 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. Information obtained under this subdivision shall not be included in any document which will become part of a public record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 657, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.2.

(a) (1) The Department of Justice shall provide to the State Department of Social Services, the Medical Board of California, and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, pursuant to state or federal law authorizing those departments to receive state or federal summary criminal history information, and may provide to any other entity authorized by state or federal law to receive state or federal summary criminal history information, subsequent state or federal arrest or disposition notification to assist in fulfilling employment, licensing, or certification duties, or the duties of approving relative caregivers, nonrelative extended family members, and resource families upon the arrest or disposition of any person whose fingerprints are maintained on file at the Department of Justice or the Federal
 Bureau of Investigation as the result of an application for licensing, employment, certification, or approval. The Department of Justice is authorized to submit fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation where the fingerprints will be retained for the purpose of being searched by future submissions to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, including latent fingerprint searches. The Department of Justice is authorized to search latent print images against all retained fingerprint submissions. This section does not authorize the notification of a subsequent disposition pertaining to a disposition that does not result in a conviction, unless the department has previously received notification of the arrest and has previously lawfully notified a receiving entity of the pending status of that arrest. If the department supplies subsequent arrest or disposition notification to a receiving entity, the
 entity shall, at the same time, expeditiously furnish a copy of the information to the person to whom it relates if the information is a basis for an adverse employment, licensing, or certification decision. If the copy is not furnished in person, the copy shall be delivered to the last contact information provided by the applicant.

(2) The Department of Justice is authorized to collect all fees related to subsequent notification services from eligible entities who may participate and remit collected fees to the Federal Bureau of Investigations.

(3) An entity that submits the fingerprints of applicants for licensing, employment, or certification, or approval to the Department of Justice for the purpose of establishing a record of the applicant to receive notification of subsequent state or federal arrests or dispositions pursuant to paragraph (1) shall comply with subdivision (d).

(b) For purposes of this section, “approval” means those duties described in subdivision (d) of Section 309 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for approving the home of a relative caregiver or of a nonrelative extended family member for placement of a child supervised by the juvenile court, and those duties in Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for resource families.

(c) An entity, other than a law enforcement agency employing peace officers as defined in Section 830.1, subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 830.2,
 subdivision (a) of Section 830.3, subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.5, and subdivision (a) of Section 830.31, shall enter into a contract with the Department of Justice in order to receive notification of subsequent state or federal arrests or dispositions for licensing, employment, or certification purposes.

(d) An entity that submits the fingerprints of applicants for licensing, employment, certification, or approval to the Department of Justice for the purpose of establishing a record of the applicant to receive notification of subsequent state or federal arrests or dispositions shall immediately notify the department when the employment of the applicant is terminated, when the applicant’s license or certificate is revoked, when the applicant may no longer renew or reinstate the license or certificate, or when a relative caregiver’s or nonrelative extended family member’s approval is terminated. The Department of Justice shall
 terminate state or federal subsequent notification on any applicant upon the request of the licensing, employment, certifying, or approving authority.

(e) An entity that receives a notification of a state or federal subsequent arrest or disposition for a person unknown to the entity, or for a person no longer employed by the entity, or no longer eligible to renew the certificate or license for which subsequent notification service was established shall immediately return the subsequent notification to the Department of Justice, informing the department that the entity is no longer interested in the applicant. The entity shall not record or otherwise retain any information received as a result of the subsequent notice.

(f) An entity that submits the fingerprints of an applicant for employment, licensing, certification, or approval to the Department of Justice for the purpose of
 establishing a record at the department or the Federal Bureau of Investigation to receive notification of subsequent arrest or disposition shall immediately notify the department if the applicant is not subsequently employed, or if the applicant is denied licensing certification, or approval.

(g) An entity that fails to provide the Department of Justice with notification as set forth in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) may be denied further subsequent notification service.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c), (d), and (f), subsequent notification by the Department of Justice and retention by the employing agency shall continue as to retired peace officers listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 190, Sec. 9.   (SB 135)   Effective September 13, 2023.   See same-numbered section added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.2.

(a) (1) The Department of Justice may provide to any entity authorized by state or federal law to receive state or federal summary criminal history information, subsequent state or federal arrest or disposition notification to assist in fulfilling employment, licensing, or certification duties, or the duties of approving relative caregivers, nonrelative extended family members, and resource families upon the arrest or disposition of any person whose fingerprints are maintained on file at the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation as the result of an application for licensing, employment, certification, or approval. The Department of Justice is authorized to submit fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation where the fingerprints will be retained for
 the purpose of being searched by future submissions to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, including latent fingerprint searches. The Department of Justice is authorized to search latent print images against all retained fingerprint submissions. This section does not authorize the notification of a subsequent disposition pertaining to a disposition that does not result in a conviction, unless the department has previously received notification of the arrest and has previously lawfully notified a receiving entity of the pending status of that arrest. If the department supplies subsequent arrest or disposition notification to a receiving entity, the entity shall, at the same time, expeditiously furnish a copy of the information to the person to whom it relates if the information is a basis for an adverse employment, licensing, or certification decision. If the copy is not furnished in person, the copy shall be delivered to the last contact information provided by the applicant.

(2) The Department of Justice is authorized to collect all fees related to subsequent notification services from eligible entities who may participate and remit collected fees to the Federal Bureau of Investigations.

(3) An entity that submits the fingerprints of applicants for licensing, employment, or certification, or approval to the Department of Justice for the purpose of establishing a record of the applicant to receive notification of subsequent state or federal arrests or dispositions pursuant to paragraph (1) shall comply with subdivision (d).

(4) The Department of Justice shall provide to the State Department of Social Services, the Medical Board of California, and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, pursuant to state or federal law authorizing those departments to receive state or federal summary
 criminal history information subsequent state or federal arrest or disposition notification to assist in fulfilling employment, licensing, or certification duties, or the duties of approving relative caregivers, nonrelative extended family members, and resource families upon the arrest or disposition of any person whose fingerprints are maintained on file at the Department of Justice or the Federal Bureau of Investigation as the result of an application for licensing, employment, certification, or approval.

(b) For purposes of this section, “approval” means those duties described in subdivision (d) of Section 309 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for approving the home of a relative caregiver or of a nonrelative extended family member for placement of a child supervised by the juvenile court, and those duties in Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for resource families.

(c) An entity shall enter into a contract with the Department of Justice in order to receive notification of subsequent state or federal arrests or dispositions for licensing, employment, or certification purposes.

(d) An entity that submits the fingerprints of applicants for licensing, employment, certification, or approval to the Department of Justice for the purpose of establishing a record of the applicant to receive notification of subsequent state or federal arrests or dispositions shall immediately notify the department when the employment of the applicant is terminated, when the applicant’s license or certificate is revoked, when the applicant may no longer renew or reinstate the license or certificate, or when a relative caregiver’s or nonrelative extended family member’s approval is terminated. For each volunteer for whom an entity requests notification of subsequent state or federal arrests or dispositions, the entity
 shall, not less than every six months, verify that each individual for whom the service has not been terminated is still a volunteer with the entity. The Department of Justice shall terminate state or federal subsequent notification on any applicant upon the request of the licensing, employment, certifying, or approving authority.

(e) An entity that receives a notification of a state or federal subsequent arrest or disposition for a person unknown to the entity, or for a person no longer employed by the entity, or no longer eligible to renew the certificate or license for which subsequent notification service was established shall immediately inform the department that the entity is no longer interested in the applicant. The entity shall not record or otherwise retain any information received as a result of the subsequent notice.

(f) An entity that submits the fingerprints of an
 applicant for employment, licensing, certification, or approval to the Department of Justice for the purpose of establishing a record at the department or the Federal Bureau of Investigation to receive notification of subsequent arrest or disposition shall immediately notify the department if the applicant is not subsequently employed, or if the applicant is denied licensing certification, or approval.

(g) An entity that fails to provide the Department of Justice with notification as set forth in subdivisions (c), (d), and (e) may be denied further subsequent notification service.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivisions (c), (d), and (f), subsequent notification by the Department of Justice and retention by the employing agency shall continue as to retired peace officers listed in subdivision (c) of Section 830.5.

(i) For
 purposes of this section, “employment” shall include contract employment and volunteer service.

(j) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 113, Sec. 37.   (SB 160)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See same-numbered section amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 190.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.3.

(a) (1) For the purposes of implementing the provisions of the National Child Protection Act, of 1993, as amended by the Volunteers for Children Act, the department shall develop the California Volunteer and Employee Criminal History Service Program pursuant to this section.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified entity may require a covered individual to undergo a fingerprint-based state and national criminal history background check.

(3) The qualified entity shall submit to the department fingerprint images and related information for covered individuals who are subject to a state and
 national criminal history background check pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105. The department shall provide a state or federal response pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 11105, except as otherwise specified.

(4) A qualified entity shall request from the department subsequent notification service for covered individuals, pursuant to Section 11105.2.

(b) (1) The department shall not require the applicant’s residence address for any request for records pursuant to subdivision (a). The department may charge a fee for the actual cost of processing the request. A fee shall not be charged to a nonprofit organization for requesting the state records of a covered individual pursuant to this section.

(2) The following procedures are established under this section:

(A) The department, upon receipt of a background check report lacking disposition data, shall conduct research in whatever recordkeeping systems are available in order to obtain complete data.

(B) A qualified entity shall register with the department before submitting a request for screening under this section. Each such request shall be voluntary. As a part of the registration, the qualified entity shall agree to comply with state and federal law and shall so indicate by signing an agreement approved by the department. The department may periodically audit qualified entities to ensure compliance with federal and state laws and regulations.

(C) The qualified entity shall maintain a waiver signed by the covered individual allowing the release of the state- and federal-level criminal history information to the qualified entity.

(D) The federal-level criminal history information is available to qualified entities to use only for the purpose of screening covered individuals. The department shall provide this federal criminal history record information directly to the qualified entity as authorized by the written waiver required pursuant to subparagraph (C) for submission of a request to the department.

(E) The determination of whether the criminal history record shows that the covered individual has been convicted of, or is under pending indictment for, any crime that bears upon the fitness of the covered
 individual to have responsibility for the safety and well-being of children, the elderly, or individuals with disabilities shall solely be made by the qualified entity. This section does not require the department to make that determination on behalf of a qualified entity.

(F) The qualified entity shall notify the person in writing of their right to obtain a copy of any background screening report, including the criminal history records, if any, contained in the report, to challenge the accuracy and completeness of any information contained in any such report, and to obtain a determination as to the validity of such challenge before a final determination regarding the person is made by the qualified entity reviewing the criminal history information.

(c) This section does not
 supersede any law requiring criminal record access or dissemination of criminal history information. In any conflict with another statute, dissemination of criminal history information shall be pursuant to the mandatory statute. This subdivision applies to, but is not limited to, requirements pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1500) of Chapter 3 of, and Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 1569) and Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70) of, Division 2 of, and Section 1522 of, the Health and Safety Code, and Sections 8712, 8811, and 8908 of the Family Code, and Section 16519.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) The department may adopt regulations to implement the provisions of this section as necessary.

(e) As used in this section, the following terms
 have the following meanings:

(1) “Care” means the provision of services, treatment, education, training, instruction, supervision, or recreation to children, the elderly, or an individual with a disability.

(2) “Child” means a person under 18 years of age.

(3) “Covered individual” means a person who has or may have access to a person served by a qualified entity and who meets one of the following criteria:

(A) Is a current or prospective volunteer of a qualified entity.

(B) Is a current or prospective employee, owner, or administrator of a qualified entity.

(4) “Elderly” means a person 60 years of age or older.

(5) “Employee” means every person in the service of a qualified entity under any appointment or contract of hire or apprenticeship, express or implied, oral or written.

(6) “Individual with a disability” means a person who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities, a person who has a history or record of a physical or mental impairment, or a person who is perceived by others as having a physical or mental impairment.

(7) “Qualified entity” means a business or organization, whether public, private, for profit, not for profit, or voluntary, that provides care or
 licenses, certifies, or places others to provide care.

(8) “Volunteer” means an individual who performs work without promise, expectation, or receipt of any compensation for any work performed.

(f) Criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section is confidential and a recipient shall not disclose its contents other than for the purpose for which it was acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 313, Sec. 24.   (AB 2796)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a contract or proprietary security organization may request any criminal history information concerning its prospective employees that may be furnished pursuant to subdivision (n) of Section 11105.

(b) The Department of Justice shall promulgate regulations to assure that criminal record information is not released to persons or entities not authorized to receive the information under this section.

(c) Any criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section shall be subject to the same requirements and conditions that the information is subject to when obtained by a human resource agency or a bank.

(d) The Legislature finds that contract security organizations and private security organizations often provide security service for financial institutions and human resource agencies, and, consequently, they have the same need for criminal history information as do those entities. Therefore, the Legislature intends to provide authority for contract security organizations and proprietary security organizations to obtain criminal history information to the extent that financial institutions and human resource agencies have that authority concerning their own employees.

(e) As used in this section, “contract security organization” means a person, business, or organization licensed to provide services as a private patrol operator, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 7582.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

As used in this section, “proprietary security organization” means an organization within a business entity that has the primary responsibility of protecting the employees and property of its employer, and which allocates a substantial part of its annual budget to providing security and protective services for its employer, including providing qualifying and in-service training to members of the organization.

(f) Any criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section is confidential and no recipient shall disclose its contents other than for the purpose for which it was acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 627, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.5.

When the Department of Justice receives a report that the record of a person has been sealed under Section 851.7, 851.8, or 1203.45, it shall send notice of that fact to all officers and agencies that it had previously notified of the arrest or other proceedings against the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 109.)
-------------------------------------------

11105.6.
